Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,151
Training division; established; purpose; State Fire Marshal; powers and duties.

The State Fire Marshal shall establish a training division for purposes of operating a statewide training program for fire department personnel, others involved in fire safety training, and other emergency responders that may require specialized training available from the training program for the purposes of developing, maintaining, and updating fire department skills and other skills of those emergency responders requiring specialized training available from the training program. The State Fire Marshal in establishing a training division shall (1) conduct training, (2) certify fire department personnel, (3) give technical assistance to fire departments and other emergency responders requiring specialized training available from the training program, and (4) conduct live fire training. The State Fire Marshal in establishing such training may also give technical assistance to rescue squads and respond to emergencies upon request for technical assistance. Fees for manuals and training shall be collected pursuant to section 81-5,152. Nothing in this section shall require mandatory participation by fire departments, individuals, or others interested in fire safety training or other specialized training available from the training program.

Laws 1980, LB 724, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-1430;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 86.